North Dakota, session 69, SB2324.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 11-09.1-06 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
11-09.1-06. Amendment or repeal.
The Except as provided in section 2 of this Act, the home rule charter adopted by anya county may
be amended or repealed by a proposal by the governing body of the county or by petition of the number
of electors provided in section 11-09.1-01, submitted to and ratified by the qualified electors of the
county. A petition to amend or repeal a home rule charter must be submitted to the governing body of
the county. Within thirty days of receipt of a valid petition or approval of a proposal to amend or repeal a
home rule charter, the governing body of the county shall publish any proposed amendment or repeal of
a home rule charter once in the official newspaper of the county. At least sixty days after publication, the
proposed amendment or repeal must be submitted to a vote of the qualified electors of the county at the
next primary or general election. The electors may accept or reject any amendment or a repeal by a
majority vote of qualified electors voting on the question at the election.
SECTION 2. A new section to chapter 11-09.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Conformance with statute or court order - Amendment.
1. When a portion of a home rule charter is preempted, superseded, or invalidated by a
legislative act or a court order, the county may amend portions of the home rule charter by a
resolution adopted by the governing body of the county. The resolution must reference the
authority supporting the amendment.
2. A resolution passed under subsection 1 is effective after adoption by the governing body of the
county. A petition, approval, or vote by the electors of the county is not required to amend a
county's home rule charter under this section. Within thirty days after adoption of the
resolution, the county shall publish the resolution once in the official newspaper of the county
or on the official county website.
3. An amendment to a charter of a home rule county intended to add any power enumerated in
section 11 - 09.1 - 05, which was not included in the county's original home rule charter, may no t
be amended under this section and must be amended under section 11 - 09.1 - 06. The county
auditor shall file a copy of an amendment to a charter of a home rule county with the secretary
of state.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 40-05.1-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:

S. B. NO. 2324 - PAGE 2
40-05.1-07. Amendment or repeal.
The Except as provided in section 4 of this Act, the home rule charter adopted by any city may be
amended or repealed by proposals submitted to and ratified by the qualified electors of the city in the
same general manner provided in sections 40-05.1-02 and 40-05.1-04 for the adoption of the charter.
Amendments may be proposed by the governing body of the city or by petition of the number of
electors provided in section 40-05.1-02 and submitted to the voters at the same election. The voters
may at their option accept or reject any or all of the amendments by a majority vote of qualified electors
voting on the question at the election. A proposal to repeal a home rule charter that has been adopted
must likewise be submitted to the electors of the city as set forth in this section. One copy of a ratified
amendment or a repeal of a home rule charter must be filed with the secretary of state and one with the
city auditor. Upon proper filing of the amendment or repeal, the courts shall take judicial notice of the
amendment or repeal.
SECTION 4. A new section to chapter 40-05.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Conformance with statute or court order - Amendment.
1. When a portion of a home rule charter is preempted, superseded, or invalidated by a
legislative act or a court order, the city may amend portions of the home rule charter by a
resolution adopted by the governing body of the city. The resolution must reference the
authority supporting the amendment.
2. A resolution passed under subsection 1 is effective after adoption by the governing body of the
city. A petition, approval, or vote by the electors of the city is not required to amend a city's
home rule charter under this section. Within thirty days after adoption of the resolution, the city
shall publish the resolution once in the official newspaper of the city or on the website of the
city.
3. An amendment to a charter of a home rule city intended to add any power enumerated in
section 40 - 05.1 - 06, which was not included in the city's original home rule charter, may not be
amended under this section and must be amended under section 40 - 05.1 - 07. The city auditor
shall file a copy of an amendment to a charter of a home rule city with the secretary of state.

S. B. NO. 2324 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2324.
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 1 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 85 Nays 6 Absent 3
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State